Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 2
COMPREHENSIVE PRIMARY AND
PREVENTIVE CARE GRANT PROGRAM

25.5-3-201. Short title. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1809, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (SB 11-216), ch. 149, p. 520, § 4, effective May 5.

25.5-3-202. Legislative declaration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1809, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(3) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2109, § 139, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (SB 11-216), ch. 149, p. 520, § 4, effective May 5.

25.5-3-203. Definitions. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1810, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(7)(a) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2109, § 140, effective August 11.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (SB 11-216), ch. 149, p. 520, § 4, effective May 5.

25.5-3-204. Comprehensive primary and preventive care grant program - creation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1811, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (SB 11-216), ch. 149, p. 520, § 4, effective May 5.

25.5-3-205. Grant-making process. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1811, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (SB 11-216), ch. 149, p. 520, § 4, effective May 5.

25.5-3-206. Reports. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1812, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

Entire section repealed, (SB 11-216), ch. 149, p. 520, § 4, effective May 5.

25.5-3-207. Program funding - comprehensive primary and preventive care fund - creation - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1039, § 9, effective May 25; entire article amended with relocations, p. 1813, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(4) added, p. 149, § 9, effective March 22.

L. 2008:

(4)(b) amended, p. 276, § 7, effective March 31.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (SB 09-269), ch. 333, p. 1768, § 8, effective June 1.

L. 2010:

(4)(c) added, (HB 10-1323), ch. 35, p. 131, § 4, effective March 22.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (SB 11-216), ch. 149, p. 520, § 5, effective May 5.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective September 15, 2011. (See L. 2011, p. 520.)